Washington statutes.
RCW 36.76.090

How to be held—Issuance of bonds.

The election shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050. If three-fifths of the legal ballots cast on the question of issuing bonds for the improvement contemplated in RCW 36.76.080 are in favor of the bond issue, the county legislative authority must issue the general obligation bonds. Such bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 31; 1983 c 167 s 91; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 53; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 29; 1963 c 4 s 36.76.090. Prior: 1913 c 25 s 2; RRS s 5593.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.